Utah statutes.
78B-12-217.   Award of tax exemption for dependent children.
(1)  No presumption exists as to which parent should be awarded the right to
claim a child or children as exemptions for federal and state income tax
purposes.  Unless the parties otherwise stipulate in writing, the court or
administrative agency shall award in any final order the exemption on a case-
by-case basis.
(2)  In awarding the exemption, the court or administrative agency shall
consider:
(a)  as the primary factor, the relative contribution of each parent to the
cost of raising the child; and
(b)  among other factors, the relative tax benefit to each parent.
(3)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2), the court or administrative agency may
not award any exemption to the noncustodial parent if that parent is not
current in his child support obligation, in which case the court or
administrative agency may award an exemption to the custodial parent.
(4)  An exemption may not be awarded to a parent unless the award will result
in a tax benefit to that parent.
